North Carolina, session 2025, HB299.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-277.1C(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Classification. – A permanent residence owned and occupied by a qualifying owner
is designated a special class of property under Article V, Section 2(2) of the North Carolina
Constitution and is taxable in accordance with this section. The first forty-five fifty-four thousand
dollars ($45,000) ($54,000) of appraised value of the residence is excluded from taxation. A
qualifying owner who receives an exclusion under this section may not receive other property
tax relief."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on
or after July 1, 2025.
*H299-v-1*